Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 12 Damage to Highways

Cross references. —

As to property destruction and defacement generally, see §

6-3-201

et seq.

As to highways generally, see title 24.

§ 31-12-101.
Metal tires with projections.

Motor vehicles, trailers and all other vehicles, contrivances or devices having metal tires shall not be operated over any of the oil, asphalt or concrete surfaced highways of the state, if the vehicle has on the periphery of any of the road wheels, any lug, flange, cleat, ridge, bolt or any projection of metal or wood which projects radially beyond the tread or traffic surface of the tire, unless the highway is protected by putting down solid planks or other suitable material, or by attachments to the wheels so as to prevent the vehicles from damaging the highway except:

This prohibition does not apply to tractors equipped with what is known as caterpillar treads, when the caterpillar does not contain any projection of any kind likely to injure the surface of the road;

It is permissible to move farm machinery other than tractors having protuberances that will not injure the highways;

It is permissible to use tire chains of reasonable proportions upon any vehicle when required because of snow, ice or other conditions tending to cause the vehicle to slide or skid.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 7, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 72-801; C.S. 1945, § 60-1001; W.S. 1957, § 31-326; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-12-102.
Penalties.

Any person violating W.S.

31-12-101

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 7, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 72-802; C.S. 1945, § 60-1002; W.S. 1957, § 31-327; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-12-103.
General liability.

Any person operating, driving or moving any vehicle, object or contrivance over a street, highway or bridge is liable for all damages which the street, highway, bridge or appurtenances thereto or other structures in connection therewith, may sustain, as a result of any illegal or negligent operation or as a result of operating, driving or moving any vehicle, object or contrivance in excess of the maximum weight or height specified and prescribed by law although authorized by a special permit issued as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 27, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 60-805; W.S. 1957, § 31-330; W.S. 1977, § 31-12-202; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to liability for damage from violation of reduced load limits for specific highways or sections thereof, or bridges, see § 31-18-802(a)(viii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of highway user for injuries resulting from failure to remove or protect against material spilled from vehicle onto public street or highway, 34 ALR4th 520.

Measure and elements of damages for injury to bridge, 31 ALR5th 171.

§ 31-12-104.
Liability for cost of safety precautions; applicability of liability to vehicle owner, lessee or bailee.

The liability provided by W.S.

31-12-103

through

31-12-105

shall include the cost of necessary safety precautions, such as warning traffic and the removal of debris resulting from accidents.

The liability provided by W.S.

31-12-103

through

31-12-105

shall apply to an owner, lessee or bailee of a vehicle, object or contrivance which is operated, driven or moved under his employ or with his express or implied permission. The owner, lessee or bailee and the driver or operator shall be jointly and severally liable for any damage.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 27, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, §§ 60-806, 60-807; W.S. 1957, §§ 31-331, 31-332; W.S. 1977, §§ 31-12-203, 31-12-204; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dropping or throwing material on highway and removal of injurious material, see §

31-5-117

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 31-12-105.
Claims by governmental agencies.

The department, in respect to streets, highways, bridges or appurtenances thereto or structures in connection therewith, under its jurisdiction may present claims for liability under W.S.

31-12-103

and

31-12-104

, bring actions in the name of the transportation commission of Wyoming for recovery thereon, together with the costs and expenses incurred in any action, and may settle and compromise claims which may arise. Local authorities in respect to streets, highways, bridges or appurtenances thereto or structures in connection therewith, under their respective jurisdictions may present claims for liability under this act [§§

31-12-103

through

31-12-105

], bring actions for recovery thereon, together with the costs and expenses incurred in any action, and settle and compromise claims which may arise.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 27, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 60-808; W.S. 1957, § 31-333; W.S. 1977, § 31-12-205; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.